src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-v_v4_kyeta-dial_Por_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 
  Verb - kyetä - ei tsekattu : # Verb 'to bring' - ei tsekattu
     kyetä+V+Inf: kyetä
     kyetä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kykenen
     kyetä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kykenet
     kyetä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kykenee
     kyetä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kykenemmä
     kyetä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kykenettä
     kyetä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kyethään
     kyetä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kykenin
     kyetä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kykenit
     kyetä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kykeni
     kyetä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kykenimmä
     kyetä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kykenittä
     kyetä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kyethiin
     kyetä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: kyeny
     kyetä+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: kyetty
     kyetä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: kyenheet
     kyetä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kykeneevä
     kyetä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: kykeneevät
     kyetä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kyettävä
     kyetä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: kyettävät
     
     kyetä+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: kykenisin
     kyetä+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: kykenisit
     kyetä+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: kykenis
     kyetä+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: kykenisimä
     kyetä+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: kykenisittä
     kyetä+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: kyettäis
     kyetä+V+Pass+Cond: kyettäis
    
     kyetä+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: kykene
     kyetä+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: kyekkää
     
     kyetä+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: kykenemässä
     kyetä+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: kykenemästä
     kyetä+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: kykenemhään
     kyetä+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: kykenemälä
     kyetä+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: kykenemättä
